Illinois, session 104th, SB2894.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 4represented in the General Assembly: 5    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Community 6Disability Living Wage Act. 7    Section 2. Findings. 8    (1) An estimated 22,000 children and adults with 9intellectual or developmental disabilities are supported in 10community-based settings in Illinois; direct support 11professionals (DSPs) are trained paraprofessional staff who 12are engaged in activities of daily living and community 13support; too many of these employees earn wages that place 14them and their families below the poverty level.15    (2) In Illinois, nearly half of direct care workers rely 16on public assistance to make ends meet, creating additional 17expenditures for State government; low wages are a consequence 18of the historically low reimbursement rates paid by the State 19of Illinois to community-based service providers. 20    (3) The lack of adequate wages for employees who perform 21the challenging work of supporting persons with intellectual 22or developmental disabilities results in high employee 23turnover, which in turn negatively impacts the quality of   SB2894- 2 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1services provided, higher wages are proven to reduce staff 2turnover, improving stability and quality of services while 3reducing employer training costs.4    (4) A December 2020 report issued by an independent 5consulting group commissioned by the State to propose changes 6to the State's reimbursement for community disability agencies 7recommended that addressing DSP wages was the number one 8priority for ensuring compliance with the mandates of the 9Ligas Consent Decree, and further recommended that wages for 10DSPs should be fixed at 150% of the prevailing minimum wage 11plus additional funding for benefits.12    (5) The difference between 150% of the State minimum wage 13on January 1, 2027 and the hourly DSP wage rate set by the 14State amounts to $1.20 per hour.15    (6) The General Assembly finds that in order to reduce 16turnover, increase retention, fill vacancies, and ensure DSPs 17are adequately compensated for the critically important work 18they do, an increase in rates and reimbursements to 19community-based service providers to effectuate an increase in 20the hourly wage paid to DSPs is needed. 21    Section 3. Purpose and intent. It is the purpose of this 22Act to increase the wages of DSPs and other frontline staff in 23community disability agencies beyond the poverty level and to 24a level competitive with rival employers and above the State 25minimum wage, in an effort to improve the lives of DSPs and the   SB2894- 3 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1lives of the vulnerable persons they support. 2    It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure that all 3funds resulting from rate increases provided to community 4disability agencies are allocated to frontline employee wages 5in order to address the current workforce crisis which is the 6primary obstacle to the availability of community-based 7services for people with disabilities. 8    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 9amended by adding Sections 5-45.71 and 5-45.72 as follows: 10    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.71 new)11    Sec. 5-45.71. Emergency rulemaking; DHS rate increase for 12direct support professionals and all frontline personnel. To 13provide for the expeditious and timely implementation of 14changes made by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 15Assembly to Section 74 of the Mental Health and Developmental 16Disabilities Administrative Act, emergency rules implementing 17the changes made by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 18Assembly to Section 74 of the Mental Health and Developmental 19Disabilities Administrative Act may be adopted in accordance 20with Section 5-45 by the Department of Human Services. The 21adoption of emergency rules authorized by Section 5-45 and 22this Section is deemed to be necessary for the public 23interest, safety, and welfare.24    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date   SB2894- 4 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 2    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.72 new)3    Sec. 5-45.72. Emergency rulemaking; DHFS rate increase for 4direct support professionals and all frontline personnel. To 5provide for the expeditious and timely implementation of 6changes made by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 7Assembly to Sections 5-5.4 and 5-5.4i of the Illinois Public 8Aid Code, emergency rules implementing the changes made by 9this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly to Sections 105-5.4 and 5-5.4i of the Illinois Public Aid Code may be adopted 11in accordance with Section 5-45 by the Department of 12Healthcare and Family Services. The adoption of emergency 13rules authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed to 14be necessary for the public interest, safety, and welfare.15    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 16of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 17    Section 10. The Mental Health and Developmental 18Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by changing Section 1974 and by adding Section 55.5 as follows: 20    (20 ILCS 1705/55.5 new)21    Sec. 55.5. Increased wages for frontline personnel. As 22used in this Section, "frontline personnel" means direct 23support professionals, aides, frontline supervisors, and   SB2894- 5 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1non-administrative support staff working in service settings 2outlined in this Section. 3    The Department shall establish reimbursement rates that 4build toward livable wages for frontline personnel in 5residential and day programs and service coordination agencies 6serving persons with intellectual or developmental 7disabilities under Section 54 of this Act, including, but not 8limited to, intermediate care for the developmentally disabled 9facilities, medically complex for the developmentally disabled 10facilities, community-integrated living arrangements, 11community day services, employment, and other residential and 12day programs for persons with intellectual or developmental 13disabilities supported by State funds or funding under Title 14XIX of the federal Social Security Act. 15    The Department shall increase rates and reimbursements so 16that by January 1, 2027 wages for direct support professionals 17shall be increased by $1.20 per hour, and so that other 18frontline personnel earn a commensurate wage.  19    (20 ILCS 1705/74)20    Sec. 74. Rates and reimbursements. 21    (a) Within 30 days after July 6, 2017 (the effective date 22of Public Act 100-23), the Department shall increase rates and 23reimbursements to fund a minimum of a $0.75 per hour wage 24increase for frontline personnel, including, but not limited 25to, direct support professionals, aides, frontline   SB2894- 6 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1supervisors, qualified intellectual disabilities 2professionals, nurses, and non-administrative support staff 3working in community-based provider organizations serving 4individuals with developmental disabilities. The Department 5shall adopt rules, including emergency rules under subsection 6(y) of Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 7Act, to implement the provisions of this Section.8    (b) Rates and reimbursements. Within 30 days after June 4, 92018 (the effective date of Public Act 100-587), the 10Department shall increase rates and reimbursements to fund a 11minimum of a $0.50 per hour wage increase for frontline 12personnel, including, but not limited to, direct support 13professionals, aides, frontline supervisors, qualified 14intellectual disabilities professionals, nurses, and 15non-administrative support staff working in community-based 16provider organizations serving individuals with developmental 17disabilities. The Department shall adopt rules, including 18emergency rules under subsection (bb) of Section 5-45 of the 19Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 20provisions of this Section.21    (c) Rates and reimbursements. Within 30 days after June 5, 222019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-10), subject to 23federal approval, the Department shall increase rates and 24reimbursements in effect on June 30, 2019 for community-based 25providers for persons with Developmental Disabilities by 3.5% 26The Department shall adopt rules, including emergency rules   SB2894- 7 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1under subsection (jj) of Section 5-45 of the Illinois 2Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of 3this Section, including wage increases for direct care staff.4    (d) For community-based providers serving persons with 5intellectual/developmental disabilities, subject to federal 6approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 7effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2022, 8shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 9to provide a $1.50 per hour wage increase for direct support 10professionals in residential settings and sufficient to 11provide wages for all residential non-executive direct care 12staff, excluding direct support professionals, at the federal 13Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 14as defined in rule by the Department.15    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 16methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 17with intellectual/developmental disabilities are subject to 18federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 19defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 20rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 21of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 22provisions of this subsection (d). 23    (e) For community-based providers serving persons with 24intellectual/developmental disabilities, subject to federal 25approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 26effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2023,   SB2894- 8 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 2to provide a $1.00 per hour wage increase for all direct 3support professionals and all other frontline personnel who 4are not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average 5wage increases, who work in residential and community day 6services settings, with at least $0.50 of those funds to be 7provided as a direct increase to base wages, with the 8remaining $0.50 to be used flexibly for base wage increases. 9In addition, the rates taking effect for services delivered on 10or after January 1, 2023 shall include an increase sufficient 11to provide wages for all residential non-executive direct care 12staff, excluding direct support professionals, at the federal 13Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 14as defined in rule by the Department.15    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 16methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 17with intellectual/developmental disabilities are subject to 18federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 19defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 20rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 21of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 22provisions of this subsection. 23    (f) For community-based providers serving persons with 24intellectual/developmental disabilities, subject to federal 25approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 26effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2024   SB2894- 9 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 2to provide a $2.50 per hour wage increase for all direct 3support professionals and all other frontline personnel who 4are not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average 5wage increases and who work in residential and community day 6services settings. At least $1.25 of the per hour wage 7increase shall be provided as a direct increase to base wages, 8and the remaining $1.25 of the per hour wage increase shall be 9used flexibly for base wage increases. In addition, the rates 10taking effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 112024 shall include an increase sufficient to provide wages for 12all residential non-executive direct care staff, excluding 13direct support professionals, at the federal Department of 14Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as defined in 15rule by the Department. 16    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 17methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 18with intellectual/developmental disabilities are subject to 19federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 20defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 21rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 22of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 23provisions of this subsection. 24    (g) For community-based providers serving persons with 25intellectual or developmental disabilities, subject to federal 26approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking   SB2894- 10 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2025 2shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 3to provide a $1 per hour wage rate increase for all direct 4support personnel and all other frontline personnel who are 5not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 6increases and who work in residential and community day 7services settings, with at least $0.75 of those funds to be 8provided as a direct increase to base wages and the remaining 9$0.25 to be used flexibly for base wage increases. These 10increases shall not be used by community-based providers for 11operational or administrative expenses. In addition, the rates 12taking effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 132025 shall include an increase sufficient to provide wages for 14all residential non-executive direct care staff, excluding 15direct support personnel, at the federal Department of Labor, 16Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as defined by rule by 17the Department. For services delivered on or after January 1, 182025, the rates shall include adjustments to 19employment-related expenses as defined by rule by the 20Department. 21    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 22methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 23with intellectual or developmental disabilities are subject to 24federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 25defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 26rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45   SB2894- 11 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 2provisions of this subsection. 3    (h) For community-based providers serving persons with 4intellectual or developmental disabilities, subject to federal 5approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 6effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2026 7shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 8to provide a $0.80 per hour wage increase for all direct 9support personnel and all other frontline personnel who are 10not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 11increases and who work in residential and community day 12services settings, with at least $0.60 of the per hour wage 13increase to be provided as a direct increase to base wages, and 14the remaining $0.20 of the per hour wage increase to be used 15flexibly for base wage increases. These increases shall not be 16used by community-based providers for operational or 17administrative expenses. In addition, the rates taking effect 18for services delivered on or after January 1, 2026 shall 19include an increase sufficient to provide wages for all 20residential non-executive direct care staff, excluding direct 21support personnel, at the federal Department of Labor, Bureau 22of Labor Statistics' average wage as defined in rule by the 23Department. 24    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 25methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 26with intellectual or developmental disabilities are subject to   SB2894- 12 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 2defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 3rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 4of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 5provisions of this subsection. 6    (i) For community-based providers serving persons with 7intellectual or developmental disabilities, subject to federal 8approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 9effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2027 10shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 11to provide a $1.20 per hour wage rate increase for all direct 12support professionals and all other frontline personnel who 13are not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average 14wage increases and who work in residential and community day 15services settings. These increases shall not be used by 16community-based providers for operational or administrative 17expenses. In addition, the rates taking effect for services 18delivered on or after January 1, 2027 shall include an 19increase sufficient to provide wages for all residential 20non-executive direct care staff, excluding direct support 21professionals, at the federal Department of Labor, Bureau of 22Labor Statistics' average wage as defined by rule by the 23Department. For services delivered on or after January 1, 242027, the rates shall include adjustments to 25employment-related expenses as defined by rule by the 26Department.  SB2894- 13 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 2methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 3with intellectual or developmental disabilities are subject to 4federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 5defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 6rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 7of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 8provisions of this subsection. 9(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 10103-588, eff. 6-5-24; 104-2, eff. 6-16-25.) 11    Section 15. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 12changing Sections 5-5.4 and 5-5.4i as follows: 13    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.4)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5-5.4)14    Sec. 5-5.4. Standards of payment; Department of Healthcare 15and Family Services. The Department of Healthcare and Family 16Services shall develop standards of payment of nursing 17facility and ICF/DD services in facilities providing such 18services under this Article which: 19    (1) Provide for the determination of a facility's payment 20for nursing facility or ICF/DD services on a prospective 21basis. The amount of the payment rate for all nursing 22facilities certified by the Department of Public Health under 23the ID/DD Community Care Act or the Nursing Home Care Act as 24Intermediate Care for the Developmentally Disabled facilities,   SB2894- 14 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1Long Term Care for Under Age 22 facilities, Skilled Nursing 2facilities, or Intermediate Care facilities under the medical 3assistance program shall be prospectively established annually 4on the basis of historical, financial, and statistical data 5reflecting actual costs from prior years, which shall be 6applied to the current rate year and updated for inflation, 7except that the capital cost element for newly constructed 8facilities shall be based upon projected budgets. The annually 9established payment rate shall take effect on July 1 in 1984 10and subsequent years. No rate increase and no update for 11inflation shall be provided on or after July 1, 1994, unless 12specifically provided for in this Section. The changes made by 13Public Act 93-841 extending the duration of the prohibition 14against a rate increase or update for inflation are effective 15retroactive to July 1, 2004. 16    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 17under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 18Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 19Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 201998 shall include an increase of 3%. For facilities licensed 21by the Department of Public Health under the Nursing Home Care 22Act as Skilled Nursing facilities or Intermediate Care 23facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 1998 shall 24include an increase of 3% plus $1.10 per resident-day, as 25defined by the Department. For facilities licensed by the 26Department of Public Health under the Nursing Home Care Act as   SB2894- 15 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1Intermediate Care Facilities for the Developmentally Disabled 2or Long Term Care for Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking 3effect on January 1, 2006 shall include an increase of 3%. For 4facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 5the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care Facilities for 6the Developmentally Disabled or Long Term Care for Under Age 722 facilities, the rates taking effect on January 1, 2009 8shall include an increase sufficient to provide a $0.50 per 9hour wage increase for non-executive staff. For facilities 10licensed by the Department of Public Health under the ID/DD 11Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities the rates taking effect 12within 30 days after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of Public 13Act 100-23) shall include an increase sufficient to provide a 14$0.75 per hour wage increase for non-executive staff. The 15Department shall adopt rules, including emergency rules under 16subsection (y) of Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative 17Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of this paragraph. 18For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 19under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and 20under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, the rates taking 21effect within 30 days after June 5, 2019 (the effective date of 22Public Act 101-10) shall include an increase sufficient to 23provide a $0.50 per hour wage increase for non-executive 24frontline personnel, including, but not limited to, direct 25support persons, aides, frontline supervisors, qualified 26intellectual disabilities professionals, nurses, and   SB2894- 16 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1non-administrative support staff. The Department shall adopt 2rules, including emergency rules under subsection (bb) of 3Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to 4implement the provisions of this paragraph. 5    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 6under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD facilities and 7under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD facilities, subject to federal 8approval of a State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 9for services delivered on or after January 1, 2027 shall 10include a $1.20 per hour wage increase for all direct support 11professionals and all other frontline personnel who are not 12subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 13increases and who work in residential and community day 14services settings. These increases shall not be used by 15facilities for operational and administrative expenses. In 16addition, for residential services delivered on or after 17January 1, 2027, the rates shall include an increase 18sufficient to provide wages for all residential non-executive 19direct care staff, excluding aides, at the federal Department 20of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as 21determined by the Department. Also, for services delivered on 22or after January 1, 2027, the rates shall include adjustments 23to employment-related expenses as defined in rule by the 24Department. The Department shall adopt rules, including 25emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the Illinois 26Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of   SB2894- 17 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1this Section. 2    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 3under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 4Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 5Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 61999 shall include an increase of 1.6% plus $3.00 per 7resident-day, as defined by the Department. For facilities 8licensed by the Department of Public Health under the Nursing 9Home Care Act as Skilled Nursing facilities or Intermediate 10Care facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 1999 shall 11include an increase of 1.6% and, for services provided on or 12after October 1, 1999, shall be increased by $4.00 per 13resident-day, as defined by the Department. 14    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 15under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 16Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 17Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 182000 shall include an increase of 2.5% per resident-day, as 19defined by the Department. For facilities licensed by the 20Department of Public Health under the Nursing Home Care Act as 21Skilled Nursing facilities or Intermediate Care facilities, 22the rates taking effect on July 1, 2000 shall include an 23increase of 2.5% per resident-day, as defined by the 24Department. 25    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 26under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities   SB2894- 18 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1or intermediate care facilities, a new payment methodology 2must be implemented for the nursing component of the rate 3effective July 1, 2003. The Department of Public Aid (now 4Healthcare and Family Services) shall develop the new payment 5methodology using the Minimum Data Set (MDS) as the instrument 6to collect information concerning nursing home resident 7condition necessary to compute the rate. The Department shall 8develop the new payment methodology to meet the unique needs 9of Illinois nursing home residents while remaining subject to 10the appropriations provided by the General Assembly. A 11transition period from the payment methodology in effect on 12June 30, 2003 to the payment methodology in effect on July 1, 132003 shall be provided for a period not exceeding 3 years and 14184 days after implementation of the new payment methodology 15as follows: 16        (A) For a facility that would receive a lower nursing 17    component rate per patient day under the new system than 18    the facility received effective on the date immediately 19    preceding the date that the Department implements the new 20    payment methodology, the nursing component rate per 21    patient day for the facility shall be held at the level in 22    effect on the date immediately preceding the date that the 23    Department implements the new payment methodology until a 24    higher nursing component rate of reimbursement is achieved 25    by that facility. 26        (B) For a facility that would receive a higher nursing   SB2894- 19 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1    component rate per patient day under the payment 2    methodology in effect on July 1, 2003 than the facility 3    received effective on the date immediately preceding the 4    date that the Department implements the new payment 5    methodology, the nursing component rate per patient day 6    for the facility shall be adjusted. 7        (C) Notwithstanding paragraphs (A) and (B), the 8    nursing component rate per patient day for the facility 9    shall be adjusted subject to appropriations provided by 10    the General Assembly. 11    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 12under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 13Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 14Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on March 1, 152001 shall include a statewide increase of 7.85%, as defined 16by the Department. 17    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 18facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 19the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 20intermediate care facilities, except facilities participating 21in the Department's demonstration program pursuant to the 22provisions of Title 77, Part 300, Subpart T of the Illinois 23Administrative Code, the numerator of the ratio used by the 24Department of Healthcare and Family Services to compute the 25rate payable under this Section using the Minimum Data Set 26(MDS) methodology shall incorporate the following annual   SB2894- 20 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1amounts as the additional funds appropriated to the Department 2specifically to pay for rates based on the MDS nursing 3component methodology in excess of the funding in effect on 4December 31, 2006:5        (i) For rates taking effect January 1, 2007, 6    $60,000,000.7        (ii) For rates taking effect January 1, 2008, 8    $110,000,000.9        (iii) For rates taking effect January 1, 2009, 10    $194,000,000. 11        (iv) For rates taking effect April 1, 2011, or the 12    first day of the month that begins at least 45 days after 13    February 16, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 14    96-1530), $416,500,000 or an amount as may be necessary to 15    complete the transition to the MDS methodology for the 16    nursing component of the rate. Increased payments under 17    this item (iv) are not due and payable, however, until (i) 18    the methodologies described in this paragraph are approved 19    by the federal government in an appropriate State Plan 20    amendment and (ii) the assessment imposed by Section 5B-2 21    of this Code is determined to be a permissible tax under 22    Title XIX of the Social Security Act.23    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 24facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 25the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 26intermediate care facilities, the support component of the   SB2894- 21 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1rates taking effect on January 1, 2008 shall be computed using 2the most recent cost reports on file with the Department of 3Healthcare and Family Services no later than April 1, 2005, 4updated for inflation to January 1, 2006. 5    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 6under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 7Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 8Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on April 1, 92002 shall include a statewide increase of 2.0%, as defined by 10the Department. This increase terminates on July 1, 2002; 11beginning July 1, 2002 these rates are reduced to the level of 12the rates in effect on March 31, 2002, as defined by the 13Department. 14    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 15under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities 16or intermediate care facilities, the rates taking effect on 17July 1, 2001 shall be computed using the most recent cost 18reports on file with the Department of Public Aid no later than 19April 1, 2000, updated for inflation to January 1, 2001. For 20rates effective July 1, 2001 only, rates shall be the greater 21of the rate computed for July 1, 2001 or the rate effective on 22June 30, 2001. 23    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 24facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 25the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 26intermediate care facilities, the Illinois Department shall   SB2894- 22 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1determine by rule the rates taking effect on July 1, 2002, 2which shall be 5.9% less than the rates in effect on June 30, 32002. 4    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 5facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 6the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 7intermediate care facilities, if the payment methodologies 8required under Section 5A-12 and the waiver granted under 42 9CFR 433.68 are approved by the United States Centers for 10Medicare and Medicaid Services, the rates taking effect on 11July 1, 2004 shall be 3.0% greater than the rates in effect on 12June 30, 2004. These rates shall take effect only upon 13approval and implementation of the payment methodologies 14required under Section 5A-12. 15    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, for 16facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 17the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 18intermediate care facilities, the rates taking effect on 19January 1, 2005 shall be 3% more than the rates in effect on 20December 31, 2004. 21    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 22facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 23the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 24intermediate care facilities, effective January 1, 2009, the 25per diem support component of the rates effective on January 261, 2008, computed using the most recent cost reports on file   SB2894- 23 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1with the Department of Healthcare and Family Services no later 2than April 1, 2005, updated for inflation to January 1, 2006, 3shall be increased to the amount that would have been derived 4using standard Department of Healthcare and Family Services 5methods, procedures, and inflators. 6    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, for 7facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 8the Nursing Home Care Act as intermediate care facilities that 9are federally defined as Institutions for Mental Disease, or 10facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 11the Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, a 12socio-development component rate equal to 6.6% of the 13facility's nursing component rate as of January 1, 2006 shall 14be established and paid effective July 1, 2006. The 15socio-development component of the rate shall be increased by 16a factor of 2.53 on the first day of the month that begins at 17least 45 days after January 11, 2008 (the effective date of 18Public Act 95-707). As of August 1, 2008, the 19socio-development component rate shall be equal to 6.6% of the 20facility's nursing component rate as of January 1, 2006, 21multiplied by a factor of 3.53. For services provided on or 22after April 1, 2011, or the first day of the month that begins 23at least 45 days after February 16, 2011 (the effective date of 24Public Act 96-1530), whichever is later, the Illinois 25Department may by rule adjust these socio-development 26component rates, and may use different adjustment   SB2894- 24 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1methodologies for those facilities participating, and those 2not participating, in the Illinois Department's demonstration 3program pursuant to the provisions of Title 77, Part 300, 4Subpart T of the Illinois Administrative Code, but in no case 5may such rates be diminished below those in effect on August 1, 62008. 7    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 8under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 9Developmentally Disabled facilities or as long-term care 10facilities for residents under 22 years of age, the rates 11taking effect on July 1, 2003 shall include a statewide 12increase of 4%, as defined by the Department. 13    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 14under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 15Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 16Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on the first 17day of the month that begins at least 45 days after January 11, 182008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-707) shall include a 19statewide increase of 2.5%, as defined by the Department. 20    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 21facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 22the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 23intermediate care facilities, effective January 1, 2005, 24facility rates shall be increased by the difference between 25(i) a facility's per diem property, liability, and malpractice 26insurance costs as reported in the cost report filed with the   SB2894- 25 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1Department of Public Aid and used to establish rates effective 2July 1, 2001 and (ii) those same costs as reported in the 3facility's 2002 cost report. These costs shall be passed 4through to the facility without caps or limitations, except 5for adjustments required under normal auditing procedures. 6    Rates established effective each July 1 shall govern 7payment for services rendered throughout that fiscal year, 8except that rates established on July 1, 1996 shall be 9increased by 6.8% for services provided on or after January 1, 101997. Such rates will be based upon the rates calculated for 11the year beginning July 1, 1990, and for subsequent years 12thereafter until June 30, 2001 shall be based on the facility 13cost reports for the facility fiscal year ending at any point 14in time during the previous calendar year, updated to the 15midpoint of the rate year. The cost report shall be on file 16with the Department no later than April 1 of the current rate 17year. Should the cost report not be on file by April 1, the 18Department shall base the rate on the latest cost report filed 19by each skilled care facility and intermediate care facility, 20updated to the midpoint of the current rate year. In 21determining rates for services rendered on and after July 1, 221985, fixed time shall not be computed at less than zero. The 23Department shall not make any alterations of regulations which 24would reduce any component of the Medicaid rate to a level 25below what that component would have been utilizing in the 26rate effective on July 1, 1984.   SB2894- 26 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1    (2) Shall take into account the actual costs incurred by 2facilities in providing services for recipients of skilled 3nursing and intermediate care services under the medical 4assistance program. 5    (3) Shall take into account the medical and psycho-social 6characteristics and needs of the patients. 7    (4) Shall take into account the actual costs incurred by 8facilities in meeting licensing and certification standards 9imposed and prescribed by the State of Illinois, any of its 10political subdivisions or municipalities and by the U.S. 11Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to Title XIX 12of the Social Security Act. 13    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 14develop precise standards for payments to reimburse nursing 15facilities for any utilization of appropriate rehabilitative 16personnel for the provision of rehabilitative services which 17is authorized by federal regulations, including reimbursement 18for services provided by qualified therapists or qualified 19assistants, and which is in accordance with accepted 20professional practices. Reimbursement also may be made for 21utilization of other supportive personnel under appropriate 22supervision. 23    The Department shall develop enhanced payments to offset 24the additional costs incurred by a facility serving 25exceptional need residents and shall allocate at least 26$4,000,000 of the funds collected from the assessment   SB2894- 27 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1established by Section 5B-2 of this Code for such payments. 2For the purpose of this Section, "exceptional needs" means, 3but need not be limited to, ventilator care and traumatic 4brain injury care. The enhanced payments for exceptional need 5residents under this paragraph are not due and payable, 6however, until (i) the methodologies described in this 7paragraph are approved by the federal government in an 8appropriate State Plan amendment and (ii) the assessment 9imposed by Section 5B-2 of this Code is determined to be a 10permissible tax under Title XIX of the Social Security Act.11    Beginning January 1, 2014 the methodologies for 12reimbursement of nursing facility services as provided under 13this Section 5-5.4 shall no longer be applicable for services 14provided on or after January 1, 2014. 15    No payment increase under this Section for the MDS 16methodology, exceptional care residents, or the 17socio-development component rate established by Public Act 1896-1530 of the 96th General Assembly and funded by the 19assessment imposed under Section 5B-2 of this Code shall be 20due and payable until after the Department notifies the 21long-term care providers, in writing, that the payment 22methodologies to long-term care providers required under this 23Section have been approved by the Centers for Medicare and 24Medicaid Services of the U.S. Department of Health and Human 25Services and the waivers under 42 CFR 433.68 for the 26assessment imposed by this Section, if necessary, have been   SB2894- 28 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1granted by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of 2the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. Upon 3notification to the Department of approval of the payment 4methodologies required under this Section and the waivers 5granted under 42 CFR 433.68, all increased payments otherwise 6due under this Section prior to the date of notification shall 7be due and payable within 90 days of the date federal approval 8is received. 9    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 10rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 11any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 12of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 13with Section 5-5e. 14    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 15under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and 16under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal 17approval, the rates taking effect for services delivered on or 18after August 1, 2019 shall be increased by 3.5% over the rates 19in effect on June 30, 2019. The Department shall adopt rules, 20including emergency rules under subsection (ii) of Section 215-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to 22implement the provisions of this Section, including wage 23increases for direct care staff. 24    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 25under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and 26under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal   SB2894- 29 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1approval, the rates taking effect on the latter of the 2approval date of the State Plan Amendment for these facilities 3or the Waiver Amendment for the home and community-based 4services settings shall include an increase sufficient to 5provide a $0.26 per hour wage increase to the base wage for 6non-executive staff. The Department shall adopt rules, 7including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the 8Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 9provisions of this Section, including wage increases for 10direct care staff. 11    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 12under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and 13under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal 14approval of the State Plan Amendment and the Waiver Amendment 15for the home and community-based services settings, the rates 16taking effect for the services delivered on or after July 1, 172020 shall include an increase sufficient to provide a $1.00 18per hour wage increase for non-executive staff. For services 19delivered on or after January 1, 2021, subject to federal 20approval of the State Plan Amendment and the Waiver Amendment 21for the home and community-based services settings, shall 22include an increase sufficient to provide a $0.50 per hour 23increase for non-executive staff. The Department shall adopt 24rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 25of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 26provisions of this Section, including wage increases for   SB2894- 30 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1direct care staff. 2    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 3under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and 4under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal 5approval of the State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 6for the residential services delivered on or after July 1, 72021, shall include an increase sufficient to provide a $0.50 8per hour increase for aides in the rate methodology. For 9facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 10the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and under the 11MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal approval of 12the State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect for the 13residential services delivered on or after January 1, 2022 14shall include an increase sufficient to provide a $1.00 per 15hour increase for aides in the rate methodology. In addition, 16for residential services delivered on or after January 1, 2022 17such rates shall include an increase sufficient to provide 18wages for all residential non-executive direct care staff, 19excluding aides, at the federal Department of Labor, Bureau of 20Labor Statistics' average wage as defined in rule by the 21Department. The Department shall adopt rules, including 22emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the Illinois 23Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of 24this Section. 25    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 26under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD facilities and   SB2894- 31 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD facilities, subject to federal 2approval of the State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 3for services delivered on or after January 1, 2023, shall 4include a $1.00 per hour wage increase for all direct support 5personnel and all other frontline personnel who are not 6subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 7increases, who work in residential and community day services 8settings, with at least $0.50 of those funds to be provided as 9a direct increase to all aide base wages, with the remaining 10$0.50 to be used flexibly for base wage increases to the rate 11methodology for aides. In addition, for residential services 12delivered on or after January 1, 2023 the rates shall include 13an increase sufficient to provide wages for all residential 14non-executive direct care staff, excluding aides, at the 15federal Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' 16average wage as determined by the Department. Also, for 17services delivered on or after January 1, 2023, the rates will 18include adjustments to employment-related expenses as defined 19in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt rules, 20including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the 21Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 22provisions of this Section. 23    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 24under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD facilities and 25under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD facilities, subject to federal 26approval of the State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect   SB2894- 32 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1for services delivered on or after January 1, 2024 shall 2include a $2.50 per hour wage increase for all direct support 3personnel and all other frontline personnel who are not 4subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 5increases and who work in residential and community day 6services settings. At least $1.25 of the per hour wage 7increase shall be provided as a direct increase to all aide 8base wages, and the remaining $1.25 of the per hour wage 9increase shall be used flexibly for base wage increases to the 10rate methodology for aides. In addition, for residential 11services delivered on or after January 1, 2024, the rates 12shall include an increase sufficient to provide wages for all 13residential non-executive direct care staff, excluding aides, 14at the federal Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor 15Statistics' average wage as determined by the Department. 16Also, for services delivered on or after January 1, 2024, the 17rates will include adjustments to employment-related expenses 18as defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall 19adopt rules, including emergency rules as authorized by 20Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to 21implement the provisions of this Section. 22    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 23under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD facilities and 24under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD facilities, subject to federal 25approval of a State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 26for services delivered on or after January 1, 2025 shall   SB2894- 33 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1include a $1.00 per hour wage increase for all direct support 2personnel and all other frontline personnel who are not 3subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 4increases and who work in residential and community day 5services settings, with at least $0.75 of those funds to be 6provided as a direct increase to all aide base wages and the 7remaining $0.25 to be used flexibly for base wage increases to 8the rate methodology for aides. These increases shall not be 9used by facilities for operational and administrative 10expenses. In addition, for residential services delivered on 11or after January 1, 2025, the rates shall include an increase 12sufficient to provide wages for all residential non-executive 13direct care staff, excluding aides, at the federal Department 14of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as 15determined by the Department. Also, for services delivered on 16or after January 1, 2025, the rates will include adjustments 17to employment-related expenses as defined in rule by the 18Department. The Department shall adopt rules, including 19emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the Illinois 20Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of 21this Section. 22    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 23under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD facilities and 24under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD facilities, subject to federal 25approval of a State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 26for services delivered on or after January 1, 2026 shall   SB2894- 34 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1include a $0.80 per hour wage increase for all direct support 2personnel and all other frontline personnel who are not 3subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 4increases and who work in residential and community day 5services settings, with at least $0.60 of those funds to be 6provided as a direct increase to all aide base wages and the 7remaining $0.20 to be used flexibly for base wage increases to 8the rate methodology for aides. These increases shall not be 9used by facilities for operational and administrative 10expenses. In addition, for residential services delivered on 11or after January 1, 2026, the rates shall include an increase 12sufficient to provide wages for all residential non-executive 13direct care staff, excluding aides, at the federal Department 14of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as 15determined by the Department. Also, for services delivered on 16or after January 1, 2026, the rates will include adjustments 17to employment-related expenses as defined in rule by the 18Department. The Department shall adopt rules, including 19emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the Illinois 20Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of 21this Section. 22    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section to the 23contrary, any regional wage adjuster for facilities located 24outside of the counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, 25and Will shall be no lower than 1.00, and any regional wage 26adjuster for facilities located within the counties of Cook,   SB2894- 35 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, and Will shall be no lower than 21.15. 3    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 4under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD facilities and 5under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD facilities, subject to federal 6approval of a State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 7for services delivered on or after January 1, 2027 shall 8include a $1.20 per hour wage increase for all direct support 9professionals and all other frontline personnel who are not 10subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 11increases and who work in residential and community day 12services settings. These increases shall not be used by 13facilities for operational and administrative expenses. In 14addition, for residential services delivered on or after 15January 1, 2027, the rates shall include an increase 16sufficient to provide wages for all residential non-executive 17direct care staff, excluding aides, at the federal Department 18of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as 19determined by the Department. Also, for services delivered on 20or after January 1, 2027, the rates shall include adjustments 21to employment-related expenses as defined in rule by the 22Department. The Department shall adopt rules, including 23emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the Illinois 24Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of 25this Section. 26(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-588, eff. 7-1-24; 104-2,   SB2894- 36 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1eff. 6-16-25.) 2    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.4i)3    Sec. 5-5.4i. Rates and reimbursements. 4    (a) Within 30 days after July 6, 2017 (the effective date 5of Public Act 100-23), the Department shall increase rates and 6reimbursements to fund a minimum of a $0.75 per hour wage 7increase for front-line personnel, including, but not limited 8to, direct support persons, aides, front-line supervisors, 9qualified intellectual disabilities professionals, nurses, and 10non-administrative support staff working in community-based 11provider organizations serving individuals with developmental 12disabilities. The Department shall adopt rules, including 13emergency rules under subsection (y) of Section 5-45 of the 14Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 15provisions of this Section.16    (b) Within 30 days after June 4, 2018 (the effective date 17of Public Act 100-587), the Department shall increase rates 18and reimbursements to fund a minimum of a $0.50 per hour wage 19increase for front-line personnel, including, but not limited 20to, direct support persons, aides, front-line supervisors, 21qualified intellectual disabilities professionals, nurses, and 22non-administrative support staff working in community-based 23provider organizations serving individuals with developmental 24disabilities. The Department shall adopt rules, including 25emergency rules under subsection (bb) of Section 5-45 of the   SB2894- 37 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 2provisions of this Section.3    (c) Within 30 days after the effective date of this 4amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly, subject to 5federal approval, the Department shall increase rates and 6reimbursements in effect on June 30, 2019 for community-based 7providers for persons with Developmental Disabilities by 3.5%. 8The Department shall adopt rules, including emergency rules 9under subsection (ii) of Section 5-45 of the Illinois 10Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of 11this Section, including wage increases for direct care staff. 12    (d) For community-based providers serving persons with 13intellectual or developmental disabilities, subject to federal 14approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 15effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2027 16shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 17to provide a $1.20 per hour wage rate increase for all direct 18support professionals and all other frontline personnel who 19are not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average 20wage increases and who work in residential and community day 21services settings. These increases shall not be used by 22community-based providers for operational or administrative 23expenses. In addition, the rates taking effect for services 24delivered on or after January 1, 2027 shall include an 25increase sufficient to provide wages for all residential 26non-executive direct care staff, excluding direct support   SB2894- 38 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1professionals, at the federal Department of Labor, Bureau of 2Labor Statistics' average wage as defined by rule by the 3Department. For services delivered on or after January 1, 42027, the rates shall include adjustments to 5employment-related expenses as defined by rule by the 6Department.7    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 8methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 9with intellectual or developmental disabilities are subject to 10federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 11defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 12rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 13of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 14provisions of this subsection. 15(Source: P.A. 100-23, eff. 7-6-17; 100-587, eff. 6-4-18; 16101-10, eff. 6-5-19.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.  SB2894- 39 -LRB104 17073 KTG 30488 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    5 ILCS 100/5-45.71 new4    5 ILCS 100/5-45.72 new5    20 ILCS 1705/55.5 new6    20 ILCS 1705/747    305 ILCS 5/5-5.4from Ch. 23, par. 5-5.48    305 ILCS 5/5-5.4i